Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-281
Artesian water; waste prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any owner or owners, lessee or lessees, occupier or occupiers, foreman or superintendent of any farm, town lot or other real estate in the State of Nebraska, where artesian water has been found or may be found hereafter, to allow the water from wells or other borings or drillings on any farm, town lot, or other real estate in Nebraska to flow out and run to waste in any manner to exceed what will flow or run through a pipe one-half of one inch in diameter, except where the water is first used for irrigation, or to create power for milling or other mechanical purposes.

Laws 1897, c. 84, § 1, p. 358;

R.S.1913, § 3527;

C.S.1922, § 2927;

C.S.1929, § 46-172;

R.S.1943, § 46-281.